Hawaii statutes.
[§587A-23] Effect of oral orders.
Orders stated orally by the court on the record in a proceeding under this
chapter shall have full force and effect from the date of the hearing until
further order of the court. All oral orders shall be reduced to writing as
soon as is practicable. [L 2010, c 135, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next